Massachusetts, session 194th, H3174.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by section 194 of
chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(jj) With respect to a taxpayer who is a non-resident for part of the taxable year, the credit
shall be further limited to the amount of allowable credit multiplied by a fraction, the numerator
of which shall be the number of days in the taxable year the person resided in the commonwealth
and the denominator of which shall be the number of days in the taxable year. A taxpayer who
incurred child or dependent care expenses through the use of child or dependent care services
shall be allowed a credit in an amount equal to $500 for each such dependent under section 151
of the Code or qualifying individual with respect to the taxpayer; provided, however, that the
allowed credit against the tax otherwise due under this subsection in the amount of 25 per cent of
the federal tax credit allowable for child and dependent care expenses in the same tax year;
provided further, if the taxpayer is married at the close of the taxable year, the credit provided in
of 2

this subsection shall be allowed if: (a) the taxpayer and the taxpayer's spouse file a joint return
for the taxable year; or (b) the taxpayer qualifies as a head of household under section 2(b) of the
Code. A person who is a non-resident for the entire taxable year shall not qualify for the credit. If
the amount of the credit allowed under this subsection exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability, the
commissioner shall treat the excess as an overpayment and shall pay the taxpayer the entire
amount of the excess without interest.
of 2